Alabama, session 2026rs, HB375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 38-9-12 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§38-9-12
(a) The department shall develop and implement dementia
training programming. The programming shall include
instruction on Alzheimer's disease and other dementias and
include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Identification of individuals with Alzheimer's
disease or other dementias.
(2) Common safety risks, including wandering, falling,
and neglect.
(3) Communication impairments and behavioral changes.
(4) Best practices for interacting with and providing
services to individuals with dementia, including
considerations for preventing abuse and neglect.
(5) For programming offered to newly hired or
contracted individuals, all of the following:
a. General information about Alzheimer's disease and
other dementias.
b. Safety risks for individuals with Alzheimer's
disease and other dementias.
c. Communication strategies and behavior management
Page 2

c. Communication strategies and behavior management
HB375 INTRODUCED
strategies for individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other
dementias.
(b) Each individual who is employed by or contracted
with the department and is responsible for seeking out adults
in need of care and protection pursuant to Section 38-9-4(b)
shall complete dementia training as follows:
(1) Upon his or her start of employment or contract
assignment, two hours of training.
(2) Every two years of employment or contract
assignment, two hours of training for purposes of continuing
education.
(c) The department may adopt rules to administer and
implement this section, including, but not limited to, rules
to develop curriculum, training schedules, and documentation
requirements.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3